Oklahoma, session 2026, SB659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Voter


Registration Integrity Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-103.2 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Legal citizen” means an individual who is a citizen of the


United States under federal law;

Req. No. 1391 Page 1


2. “Resident of Oklahoma” means an individual who resides


within the State of Oklahoma and meets the residency requirements


for voter registration under the laws of this state; and


3. “State agency” means all state agencies including, but not


limited to, Service Oklahoma, licensed operators, and any entity


authorized to process voter registration applications.


B. No state agency, including Service Oklahoma and licensed


operators, shall provide voter registration materials to any


individual without first verifying that the individual is a legal


citizen and resident of this state in accordance with all applicable


laws. Agencies shall document and retain records of citizenship and


residency verification for a minimum of five (5) years.


C. Any individual agent of a state agency who knowingly and


willfully violates this act by providing voter registration


materials without first verifying citizenship and residency, as


required, shall upon conviction be guilty of a misdemeanor,


punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00), a term of imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed


thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


D. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall provide


oversight to ensure compliance with this act.


E. Any state agency that processes voter registration materials


shall submit an annual compliance report to the State Election Board


no later than January 31 of each year for the preceding year.

Req. No. 1391 Page 2


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1391 TEK 1/19/2025 5:40:52 AM











































Req. No. 1391 Page 3